Hawaii statutes.
§147-33 Prohibited acts. No commercial
exporter shall ship any fresh or processed flowers or foliage to points outside
the State unless such products meet the minimum export quality and condition
requirements and are so packaged in containers with such packaging material and
in such a manner as to meet the minimum packaging requirements established by
rules and regulations promulgated under this part. [L 1959, c 267, pt of §2;
Supp, §22-26.4; HRS §147-33]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next